District of Columbia statutes.
5-543.03

Service step adjustments.

(a)

Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this section, each officer and member, if he has a current performance rating of “satisfactory” or better, shall have his service step adjusted in the following manner:

(1)

Each officer and member in service step 1, 2, or 3 of salary class 1 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 52 calendar weeks of active service in his service step;

(2)

Each officer and member in service step 4 or 5 of salary class 1 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 104 calendar weeks of active service in his service step;

(3)

Each officer and member in service step 6, 7, or 8 of salary class 1 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 156 calendar weeks of active service in his service step; and

(4)

Each officer and member in salary classes 2 through 11 who has not attained the maximum service step rate of compensation for the rank or title in which he is placed shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step rate for such rank or title at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 104 calendar weeks of active service in his service step, except that in the case of an officer or member in service step 4, 5, or 6 of salary class 2 or 3, service step 4 or 5 of salary class 4, and service step 4 of salary class 5, such officer or member shall be advanced successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 156 calendar weeks of active service in his service step.

(5)

Each officer and member of the United States Park Police with a current performance rating of “satisfactory” or better, shall have a service step adjustment in the following manner:

(A)

Each officer and member in service step 1, 2, or 3 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 52 calendar weeks of active service in the officer’s or member’s service step.

(B)

Each officer and member in service step 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, or 9 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 104 calendar weeks of active service in the officer’s or member’s service step.

(C)

Each officer and member in service step 10 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 156 calendar weeks of active service in the officer’s or member’s service step.

(D)

Each officer and member in service steps 11, 12, or 13 shall be advanced in compensation successively to the next higher service step at the beginning of the 1st pay period immediately subsequent to the completion of 208 calendar weeks of active service in the officer’s or member’s service step.

(b)

As used in this part, the term “calendar week of active service” includes all periods of leave with pay, and periods of nonpay status which do not cumulatively equal 1 basic workweek.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, employees appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72 shall receive compensation as a result of promotion or transfer in accordance with this section.

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 85-584, title III, § 303
Sept. 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 881, Pub. L. 88-575, title I, § 104
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1593, Pub. L. 89-810, title I, § 103
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 356, Pub. L. 91-297, title I, § 104
Aug. 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 637, Pub. L. 92-410, title I, § 107
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 103(e), 47 DCR 4619
Dec. 21, 2000, 114 Stat. 2763, Pub. L. 106-554, § 1(a)(4), H.R. 5666 § 904(a)
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(2)(D)
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
This section is referenced in § 5-545.06a.
1981 Ed., § 4-412.
1973 Ed., § 4-829.
Pub. L. 111-282, in subsec. (a)(5), deleted “the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division and” following “member of”.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(112) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.